Washington statutes.
RCW 32.50.060

Suit filed after savings bank in conservatorship.

Any suit filed against a savings bank, or its conservator, after the entrance of an order by the director placing such savings bank in conservatorship and while such order is in effect, shall be brought in the superior court of the county of its principal place of business and not elsewhere. The conservator appointed for such savings bank may file suit in the superior court of the county of its principal place of business or other court of competent jurisdiction against any person for the purpose of preserving, protecting, or recovering any asset or property of such savings bank, including claims or causes of action belonging to or which may be asserted by such savings bank.

[ 2010 c 88 s 71.]